Utah statutes.
78B-8-505.   Litigation expense award authorized in appeals from administrative decisions.

(1)  In any civil judicial appeal taken from an administrative decision regarding a matter in which the administrative action was commenced by the state, and which involves the business regulatory functions of the state, a court may award reasonable litigation expenses to any small business which is a named party if the small business prevails in the appeal and the court finds that the state action was undertaken without substantial justification.

(2)  Any state agency or political subdivision may require by rule or ordinance that a small business exhaust administrative remedies prior to making a claim under this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

